Georgia statutes. TITLE 22 Eminent Domain
Article 8 Electric Transmission Lines

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2004, p. 568, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this article: “shall apply to the exercise of eminent domain to acquire easements or other property interests for which land acquisition negotiations for purposes of constructing or expanding one or more electric transmission lines begin on or after such date. The provisions of this Act relating to additional compensation, reconveyance, and quitclaim shall apply to easements and other property interests acquired on or after July 1, 2004, through the exercise of eminent domain.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2004 enactment of this article, see 21 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 157 (2004).

22-3-160.
“Utility” defined.

As used in this article, the term “utility” means a person, corporation, or other entity that generates, transmits, distributes, supplies, or sells electricity for public or private use in this state or generates electricity in this state for transmission or distribution outside this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

22-3-160

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 22/HB 95.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 22, redesignated the former provisions of this Code section as Code Section 22-3-160.1 and enacted the present provisions.

22-3-160.1.
Public hearings required; exception to hearing requirement.

Before exercising the right of eminent domain for purposes of constructing or expanding an electric transmission line with a design operating voltage of 115 kilovolts or greater and a length of one mile or more, any utility shall schedule and hold one or more public meetings with an opportunity for comment by members of the public. In any proceeding to exercise the right of eminent domain for purposes of an electric transmission line for which the utility began land acquisition negotiations on or after July 1, 2004, the utility shall be required to demonstrate substantial compliance with this Code section as a condition for exercising the right of eminent domain.

Prior to the public meeting or meetings required by this Code section, the utility shall provide adequate public notice of the utility’s intent to construct or expand an electric transmission line and adequate public notice of the public meeting or meetings related to the electric transmission line as follows:

By publishing adequate public notice of said public meeting or meetings in a newspaper of general circulation in each county in which any portion of the electric transmission line is to be constructed or expanded. Said notice shall be published at least 30 days prior to the date of the first public meeting related to the electric transmission line and shall include the following: the date, time, and location of each meeting; a statement that the purpose of the meeting or meetings is to provide public notice of the utility’s intent to construct or expand an electric transmission line for which the right of eminent domain may be exercised; a description of the proposed project including the general route of the electric transmission line and the general property area within which the utility intends to construct or expand the electric transmission line; the width of the proposed transmission line route; and a description of the alternative construction approaches considered by the utility and a statement of why such alternatives were rejected by the utility; and

By providing written notice of the public meeting or meetings, by means of certified mail, to each owner of property, as indicated in the tax records of the county in which such property is located, over which the utility intends to construct or expand the electric transmission line and to the chairpersons or chief executives of the counties and the mayors of any municipalities in which such property is located. Such notice shall be mailed at least 30 days prior to the date of the first public meeting related to the electric transmission line and shall include all of the information required by paragraph (1) of this subsection.

At least one public meeting shall be held in each county in which the electric transmission line would be located. In any county in which the electric transmission line would require acquisition of property rights from more than 50 property owners, two or more public meetings shall be held. The public meetings shall be held in an accessible location and shall be open to members of the public. At least one of the public meetings shall commence between 6:00 P.M. and 7:00 P.M., inclusive, on a business weekday. At the public meetings, the utility shall provide a description of the proposed project including the general route of the electric transmission line and the general property area within which the utility intends to construct or expand the electric transmission line, the width of the proposed transmission line route, and a description of the alternative construction approaches considered by the utility and a statement of why such alternatives were rejected by the utility. At the public meetings, the utility shall allow a reasonable opportunity for members of the public to express their views on the proposed project and to ask questions.

A utility shall not be required to give notice of or hold public meetings with respect to any of the following:

An electric transmission line to be constructed or expanded by a utility on an established right of way or land that was acquired by the utility or any other utility prior to July 1, 2004;

An electric transmission line for which the utility began land acquisition negotiations prior to July 1, 2004;

An electric transmission line to be constructed or expanded by a utility on an established right of way or land that is owned or controlled by a state agency, a county, a municipality, or an agency, bureau, or department of the United States;

An electric transmission line to be constructed or expanded by a utility for the purpose of relocating an existing electric transmission line at the direction, order, or request of a state agency, a county, a municipality, or an agency, bureau, or department of the United States;

An electric transmission line to be constructed or expanded by a utility without exercising the power of eminent domain to acquire the right of way or easement area for such line; or

An electric transmission line to be constructed by a utility for the purpose of serving an electric substation or switching station to be constructed on a site that is owned or controlled by a utility customer to be served by such substation or switching station.

History.

Code 1981, §

22-3-160

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 568, § 2; Code 1981, §

22-3-160.1

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 22/HB 95.

22-3-161.
Selection of route for electric transmission line; settlement negotiations with property owners.

On and after July 1, 2004, before exercising the right of eminent domain for purposes of constructing or expanding an electric transmission line described in subsection (a) of Code Section 22-3-160.1, the utility shall select a practical and feasible route for the location of the electric transmission line. In selecting the route for the location of the electric transmission line, the utility shall consider existing land uses in the geographic area where the line is to be located, existing corridors, existing environmental conditions in the area, engineering practices related to the construction and operation of the line, and costs related to the construction, operation, and maintenance of the line.

After the utility has selected the preferred route for the location of an electric transmission line, the utility shall attempt in good faith to negotiate a settlement with each property owner from whom the utility needs to acquire property rights for the line. In connection with the negotiations, the utility shall provide the property owner with a written offer to purchase the property rights, a document that describes the property rights, and a drawing that shows the location of the line on the owner’s property.

The requirements of subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section shall not apply to an electric transmission line described in subsection (d) of Code Section 22-3-160.1.

History.

Code 1981, §

22-3-161

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 568, § 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 22/HB 95.

22-3-162.
Application; additional compensation or reconveyance.

This Code section shall apply to any easement or other property interest acquired on or after July 1, 2004, through exercise of the right of eminent domain for purposes of constructing or expanding an electric transmission line:

With a capacity of 230 kilovolts or less if the utility has not begun such construction or expansion within 12 years from the date of acquisition and the land burdened by the easement or other property interest is not adjacent to an electric transmission line corridor in existence 12 years from the date of acquisition;

With a capacity of more than 230 kilovolts if the utility has not begun such construction or expansion within 15 years from the date of acquisition and the land burdened by the easement or other property interest is not adjacent to an electric transmission line corridor in existence 15 years from the date of acquisition; and

Of any capacity if the land burdened by the easement or other property interest is adjacent to an electric transmission line corridor in existence 15 years after the date of acquisition and the utility has not begun the construction or expansion for which the easement or other property right was acquired within 15 years from the date of acquisition.

When this Code section becomes applicable to an easement or other property interest, the owner of the land burdened by such easement or property interest may apply to the utility that acquired the easement or other property interest or such utility’s successor or assign for reconveyance or quitclaim of the easement or other property interest or for additional compensation for such easement or other property interest. The application shall be in writing, and the utility or its successor or assign shall act on the application within 60 days by:

Executing a reconveyance or quitclaim of the easement or property interest upon receipt of compensation not to exceed the amount of the compensation paid by the utility for the easement or property interest at the time of acquisition; or

Paying additional compensation to the owner of the land burdened by the easement or other property interest, such compensation to be calculated by subtracting the price paid by the utility for the easement or other property interest at the time of acquisition from the fair market value of the easement or other property interest at the time this Code section becomes applicable to such easement or other property interest.

The choice between additional compensation or reconveyance or quitclaim shall be at the discretion of the utility or its successor or assign.

History.

Code 1981, §

22-3-162

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 568, § 2.

Law reviews.

For survey article on zoning and land use law, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (2008).